Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-234
Certificate of registration; Board of Barber Examiners; suspend or revoke; notice; hearing.

The Board of Barber Examiners may suspend or revoke the certificate of registration of any barber who has violated any order of the board promulgated hereunder; Provided, no certificate of registration shall be suspended or revoked by the board until (1) the person accused has been given at least twenty days' notice in writing of the charge against him and (2) a public hearing is had by the board.

Laws 1945, c. 174, § 7, p. 557.